extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Falklandy/q po:noun is:masculine
Galapagy/q po:noun is:masculine
Karpaty/q po:noun is:masculine
Komory/q po:noun is:masculine
Nedozery/q po:noun is:masculine
Tlmace/q po:noun is:masculine
Vary/q po:noun is:masculine
alimenty/q po:noun is:masculine
analy/q po:noun is:masculine
boby/q po:noun is:masculine
droby/q po:noun is:masculine
dzinsy/q po:noun is:masculine
fasiangy/q po:noun is:masculine
haby/q po:noun is:masculine
hody/q po:noun is:masculine
ihlicie/q po:noun is:neuter
kmotrovci/q po:noun is:masculine
leginsy/q po:noun is:masculine
lopusie/q po:noun is:neuter
mangrovy/q po:noun is:masculine
maskace/q po:noun is:masculine
nespory/q po:noun is:masculine
pacesy/q po:noun is:masculine
pancuchace/q po:noun is:masculine
priezvedy/q po:noun is:neuter
roraty/q po:noun is:masculine
slipy/q po:noun is:masculine
subtropy/q po:noun is:masculine
vohlady/q po:noun is:masculine
vyzvedy/q po:noun is:masculine
zalety/q po:noun is:masculine
zvedy/q po:noun is:masculine
